Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 4

Division of Claims and Risk Management

9-8-401. Creation.

There is hereby created a division of claims and risk management as a division of the department of the treasury. The staff of the present board of claims shall also be the staff of the division of claims and risk management.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 9; 2017, ch. 271, § 1.

9-8-402. Claims.

The claimant must give written notice of the claimant's claim to the division of claims and risk management as a condition precedent to recovery, except claims for recovery of taxes shall be filed directly with the administrative clerk of the claims commission. The filing of a false notice with the division of claims and risk management is punishable as a Class A misdemeanor.

The notice shall state the circumstances upon which the claim is based, including, but not limited to: the state department, board, institution, agency, commission or other state entity that allegedly caused the injury; the time and place of the incident from which the claim arises; and the nature of the claimant's injury.

The entire disputed amount of tax, penalty and interest must be paid under protest before any action can be filed contesting the assessment of any tax. The claim for recovery of taxes must be filed with the claims commission within six (6) months of the payment under protest. This is the sole and exclusive jurisdiction for determining tax liability, except that any tax collected or administered by the commissioner of revenue shall be contested according to chapter 749 of the Acts of 1986, and any unemployment insurance tax collected or administered by the commissioner of labor and workforce development shall be contested according to title 50, chapter 7.

No writ for the prevention of the collection of any revenue claimed, or to hinder and delay the collection of the same, shall in anywise issue, either injunction, supersedeas, prohibition, or any other writ or process whatever; but in all cases in which, for any reason, any person shall claim that the tax so collected was wrongfully or illegally collected, the remedy for that party shall be as herein provided, and in no other manner.

The notice to the division is deemed to be notice to the employer for workers' compensation purposes. Claims not within the jurisdiction of the claims commission shall be sent to the board of claims. A copy of any claim filed with or transferred to the claims commission must be served on the attorney general and reporter and the division of claims and risk management by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by such other method as the attorney general and reporter deems appropriate.

The claim is barred unless the notice is given within the time provided by statutes of limitations applicable by the courts for similar occurrences from which the claim arises; provided, however, that, for workers' compensation purposes, the right to compensation and other benefits under the Workers' Compensation Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 6, shall be barred, unless the notice required by subsection (a) is filed with the division of claims and risk management within one (1) year after the accident resulting in injury. The filing of the notice by the claimant tolls all statutes of limitations as to other persons potentially liable to the claimant due to the occurrence from which the claim before the commission arises. The applicable statute of limitations for the recovery of taxes shall continue to be six (6) months after the payment of the taxes under protest. Absent prior written consent of the commission, it is mandatory that any claim filed with the claims commission upon which no action is taken by the claimant to advance the case to disposition within any one-year period of time be dismissed with prejudice.

The division of claims and risk management shall investigate every claim and shall make every effort to honor or deny each claim within ninety (90) days of receipt of the notice. If the claim is denied, the division shall so notify the claimant and inform the claimant of the reasons therefor and of the claimant's right to file a claim with the claims commission within ninety (90) days of the date of the denial notice. If the claim is honored and the damages may be ascertained within the ninety-day settlement period, the division shall so notify the claimant, and inform the claimant of the conditions of the settlement offer, and of the claimant's right to file such claimant's claim with the claims commission within ninety (90) days of the date of the settlement notice if the conditions of the settlement offer are unacceptable. If the claim is honored and the amount of damages may not be ascertained within the ninety-day settlement period because evidence of loss will be obtained after the ninetieth day of the settlement period, the division shall so notify the claimant and inform the claimant of the claimant's right to file a claim with the claims commission within ninety (90) days of the date the division forwards final compensation to the claimant or upon written request for transfer to the commission by the claimant; provided, that final compensation shall be forwarded to the claimant within one (1) year of the date of the settlement notice. If the division fails to honor or deny the claim within the ninety-day settlement period, the division shall automatically transfer the claim to the administrative clerk of the claims commission.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) or any other law to the contrary, if the division denies the compensability of a workers' compensation claim, the division shall so notify the claimant and inform the claimant of the reasons for the denial, and of the claimant's right to request an alternative dispute resolution, pursuant to § 50-6-236, within ninety (90) days from the date of the denial notice. If the division fails to honor or deny the compensability of a workers' compensation claim within the ninety-day settlement period, the division shall submit the dispute to the alternative dispute resolution process, as provided in § 50-6-236.

Where the division of claims and risk management has paid workers' compensation benefits, either voluntarily or as a result of an order to do so, within one (1) year following the accident resulting in injury, the claimant must file a petition for benefit determination, pursuant to § 50-6-236, no later than one (1) year from the latter of the date of the last authorized treatment or the time the division ceased to make payments of compensation to or on behalf of the claimant, in order for the claimant to recover any unpaid or further workers' compensation benefits. For purposes of this section, the issuing date of the last voluntary payment of compensation, not the date of its receipt, shall constitute the time the division ceased making payments and the division shall provide such date on request.

In conducting any alternative dispute resolution pursuant to this subsection (d), the conference shall be held in the county where the employee lives, unless otherwise agreed to between the parties or otherwise directed by the commissioner. A workers' compensation specialist, as defined in § 50-6-102, shall have the authority to continue or reschedule an alternative dispute resolution.

In the event an agreement cannot be reached through alternative dispute resolution as to all issues related to the claim, the claimant shall have ninety (90) days, after the issuance of a dispute certification notice as provided in § 50-6-236, to file a claim with the claims commission. A claim for workers' compensation benefits must be instituted in the claims commission within that ninety (90) days.

No claim for workers' compensation shall be filed with the claims commission until the alternative dispute resolution process, as provided in § 50-6-236, has been exhausted. Notwithstanding this subsection (d), if the parties have mutually agreed to a compromise and settlement of a claim for workers' compensation, the parties shall not be required to exhaust the alternative dispute resolution process before filing a claim and submitting the compromise and settlement to the claims commission for approval, pursuant to § 9-8-307(a)(1)(K), or to a workers' compensation judge pursuant to § 50-6-240. If the settlement is not approved, the parties shall then exhaust the alternative dispute resolution process.

The right to compensation for an occupational disease, or a claim for death benefits as a result of an occupational disease, must be initiated within the time periods set forth in this section; provided, however, that the applicable time limitation period or periods shall commence as of the date of the beginning of the incapacity for work resulting from an occupational disease, or upon the date death results from the occupational disease; provided, however, that, if, upon the date of the death of the employee, the employee's claim has become barred, the claim of the employee's dependent or dependents shall likewise be barred.

In case of physical or mental incapacity, other than minority, of the injured person or such injured person's dependents to perform or cause to be performed any action required within the time specified in this section, then the period of limitation in such case shall be extended for one (1) year from the date when such incapacity ceases.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 10; 1985, ch. 105, §§ 2, 9, 10; 1986, ch. 626, § 11; 1986, ch. 749, § 2; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1998, ch. 785, §§ 16, 17; 2004, ch. 699, § 2; 2005, ch. 384, §§ 4-6; 2013, ch. 289, §§ 96-99; 2017, ch. 271, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For disposition of Acts 1986, ch. 749, see the Session Law Disposition Table in Volume 13 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2005, ch. 384, § 7 provided that the act shall apply to accidents or injuries occurring on or after July 1, 2005.

Acts 2013, ch. 289, § 103 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Workers' Compensation Reform Act of 2013.”

Cross-References. Payment of tax under protest, title 67, ch. 1, part 9.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

9-8-403. Dockets — Determination of claims — Appeals — Notice of appeal.

The commission shall maintain two (2) separate dockets. Upon transfer to the administrative clerk of the claims commission, the claim shall be assigned to the applicable docket:

A regular docket similar to those maintained by courts of record. A court reporter shall be utilized at all hearings on claims on the regular docket and a record of such proceedings shall be made. These proceedings shall be conducted pursuant to the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure where applicable and otherwise pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. The decisions of the individual commissioners may be appealed to the entire claims commission pursuant to rules promulgated by the commission. The decisions of the individual commissioners or, when rendered, decisions of the entire commission regarding claims on the regular docket may be appealed to the Tennessee court of appeals pursuant to the same rules of appellate procedure which govern interlocutory appeals and appeals from final judgments in trial court civil actions, except that tax appeals shall go directly to the Tennessee supreme court and workers' compensation appeals shall be appealed pursuant to the procedure for other workers' compensation cases under § 50-6-225; or

A small claims docket consisting of claims satisfying the monetary limit applicable to the general sessions court of Davidson County. No court reporter shall be utilized nor any record made of these proceedings. These proceedings shall be conducted pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. If a claimant consents to having the claimant's claim proceed upon affidavits filed with the commission without a hearing, the state shall be deemed to have waived a hearing on the claim unless the state requests a hearing within sixty (60) days after the claim is filed with, or transferred to, the commission. No appeal may be taken from a commissioner's decision regarding claims appearing on the small claims docket.

All claims shall be heard without the aid of a jury. The claimant may appear on such claimant's own behalf or through counsel.

At the discretion of either party at any time prior to a hearing, a claim may be removed from the small claims docket to the regular docket. Once removed, the claim shall be treated like any other claim on the regular docket.

The state may, under rules promulgated by the commission, bring third parties before the commission when necessary to determine the ultimate liability.

The commission shall also determine all claims on behalf of the state against the claimant arising out of the same occurrence.

The state may assert any or all available defenses.

A settlement offer by either party may not be used as evidence in a later commission hearing.

Claims based on the negligent care, custody or control of personal property by persons in the legal custody of the state shall proceed on affidavits only, except where the commission determines that witnesses should be heard.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, claims for compensation filed under the Criminal Injuries Compensation Act, compiled in title 29, chapter 13, and § 40-24-107, shall be heard on the small claims docket only, unless removed to the regular docket pursuant to subsection (c).

Commissioners shall provide findings of facts and conclusions of law on the disposition of all claims on the regular docket. Except as provided in § 29-13-109, an order disposing of a claim on the small claims docket need not include findings of fact and conclusions of law unless requested by a party. The commission is encouraged to make oral decisions immediately after a hearing on any claim if the commission finds that further deliberation is unnecessary. If a claim is disposed of by an oral ruling, counsel for the prevailing party shall prepare and submit an appropriate order reflecting such ruling. Such order shall include proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law if the claim was heard on the regular docket or if a party requested such findings and conclusions in a hearing on the small docket. Any orders prepared by counsel for the prevailing party shall be submitted to the adverse party for approval.

If a claimant appeals the decision of a commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a)(1), the claimant shall, in addition to complying with all other requirements for perfecting an appeal, notify the clerk of the commission by filing the notice of appeal with the clerk. The notice shall be accompanied by a bond payable to the State of Tennessee in an amount determined by the clerk to be sufficient to defray the cost of preparing the transcript. The bond shall be in the form of a cash deposit, or by bond secured either by a corporation authorized under the laws of this state to act as surety on such a bond or by one (1) or more individual personal sureties residing within this state and who own real estate within this state. The bond shall be conditioned to pay the charge for services of the court reporter in preparing the transcript of the evidence introduced at the hearing before the commission. Whenever security is given in the form of a bond with one (1) or more sureties, the address of each surety shall be shown on the bond. In the event the claimant does not obtain the relief prayed for in the claimant's appeal, the cost of preparing the transcript shall be taxed against the claimant and shall be paid by the claimant or the surety on the bond filed with the commission.

In the discretion of the claims commission and by agreement of the parties, all or part of a hearing may be conducted by electronic means.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 11; 1985, ch. 105, §§ 8, 14; 1997, ch. 34, § 2; 1997, ch. 165, §§ 6-8, 13; 1998, ch. 785, §§ 10-14; 1999, ch. 145, § 1; 2000, ch. 573, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 573, § 5, provided that the amendment to this section by that act shall apply to all claims for compensation arising from offenses occurring on or after July 1, 1999.

The subsection designation was deleted from the reference to §50-6-225 in (a)(1) due to amendment of that section by Acts 2013, ch. 289, § 60, effective July 1, 2014.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 2-12-1.

Law Reviews.

State Liability at the Tennessee Claims Commission: Balancing Sovereign Immunity and Individual Rights of Redress (Steven W. Feldman), 37 Tenn. B.J. 19 (2001).

9-8-404. Removal of claims — Appeals.

Prior to hearing, upon the petition of either party showing the approval of the attorney general and reporter, the claim shall be removed to the appropriate chancery or circuit court with venue for handling in accordance with this part, except the normal procedural rules of the court shall be applicable. Appeal from the chancery or circuit court shall be to the court of appeals.

The commission may transfer the action to the appropriate chancery or circuit court with venue on its own after a determination, in writing, by the commission that fair and complete resolution of all claims involved cannot be accomplished in administrative proceedings before the commission. Such transfers shall be limited to tort claims arising out of the same fact situation where much of the evidence to be presented would be admissible against the state and one (1) or more additional defendants. If such transferred claim is not consolidated for trial, the claim against the state shall be transferred back to the commission. If, prior to the time of trial, all claims other than those against the state have been dismissed, settled or otherwise concluded, upon motion of the state the claim shall be transferred back to the commission. The transferred claim shall be handled in accordance with this part, except the normal procedural rules of the court shall be applicable. Appeal from the chancery or circuit court shall be to the court of appeals.

If the docket for any grand division becomes overloaded in the judgment of the commission chair, the chair may assign one (1) of the other two (2) commissioners to hear some of those claims in that division.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 12; 1988, ch. 850, § 2; 1989, ch. 491, §§ 3, 4; 1990, ch. 806, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Venue for action against state concerning real property lien, §20-13-110.

9-8-405. Settlement of claims — Mediation.

Any claim filed with the division may be settled pursuant to § 20-13-103, following consultation with the governmental entity affected therein. Additionally, the attorney general and reporter, with the written approval of the governor and the comptroller of the treasury, may authorize the state treasurer to settle certain classes of claims without the necessity of complying with § 20-13-103.

In the event of disapproval of a proposed settlement, the claim shall be processed in the same manner as other claims before the commission.

By agreement of the parties, a mediator may be employed in an attempt to settle a claim. Such a claim still must be settled in accordance with subsection (a) and/or § 20-13-103. Costs associated with alternative dispute resolution, as agreed to by the parties, shall be paid from the risk management fund.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 13; 1997, ch. 165, § 9; 2003, ch. 212, § 8.

9-8-406. Representation of state — Negotiation of prehearing claim settlements.

The attorney general and reporter shall represent the state in all claims before the commission; however, the attorney general and reporter may delegate to the department of the treasury or the governmental entity against which the claim is made the authority to negotiate prehearing claim settlements, and to represent the state in proceedings before the claims commission or any portion of that authority which the attorney general and reporter deems appropriate.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 14.

9-8-407. Actions against third parties for reimbursement.

Whenever the acts or omissions of a third party are the proximate cause of an incident giving rise to a claim against the state for which the state has, pursuant to this chapter, compensated the person injured or damaged by the acts or omissions of such third party, the state of Tennessee may institute an action against such third party for the recovery of the whole or any specified part of the amount paid by the state in the appropriate court in Tennessee, or in the federal, state or district court in which such third party resides.

As a condition for the settlement of a claim filed under this chapter in which a third party may be liable, the state treasurer, exercising the settlement authority delegated to the state treasurer pursuant to § 9-8-405, shall require the claimant to agree, by such form as the attorney general and reporter may direct, to cooperate fully with appropriate officials of the state should the state proceed to institute an action against a third party to recover the whole or any specified part of the amount paid by the state. Should the claimant fail to cooperate with the state in accordance with such agreement, the state shall have the right to recover any amounts paid by the state to the claimant. In awarding compensation, the claims commission shall include a requirement that the claimant execute an agreement with the state to cooperate with the state in an action against a liable third party in accordance with this section, unless the commission finds that the facts in such claim dictate that such an agreement should not be required.

Should any claimant choose to exercise such claimant's right to recover damages in civil court for injury or damages, such claimant shall notify the attorney general and reporter of the institution of such a lawsuit by serving the attorney general and reporter through the United States mail with a copy of the complaint, all subsequent pleadings and a copy of the final judgment in order to give the state notice of the existence of such an action so that the state may pursue its subrogated interest.

Acts 1986, ch. 626, § 10.

9-8-408. Confidentiality of medical records maintained by division.

Medical records received and maintained by the division of claims and risk management shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public pursuant to title 10, chapter 7.

As used in this section:

“Healthcare provider” means healthcare professionals, establishments, or facilities licensed, registered, certified, or permitted pursuant to title 63 or title 68 and regulated under the authority of either the department of health or any agency, board, council, or committee attached to the department of health; and

“Medical record” means any and all documents maintained by a healthcare provider relating to a patient's diagnosis, care, and treatment, including, but not limited to, notes, reports, memos, e-mails, facsimile transmissions, laboratory tests, billing documents, and medication orders.

Acts 2015, ch. 47, § 2; 2017, ch. 271, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of Public Records, §10-7-504.

9-4-508. Collateral pool boards — Powers and duties.

9-4-522. Deposits of funds — Operating expenses.

9-4-5608. Evaluation of compliance — Report.

9-8-107. Defense counsel commission functions and responsibilities transferred to board of claims.